Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2595.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; attorney general; Coconino county; juvenile services The sum of $45,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the attorney general for distribution to Coconino county for the purpose of constructing and purchasing equipment for a new juvenile court services facility and converting the existing juvenile detention center into a detox, sobriety and crisis recovery center.